Utah statutes.
77-29-9.   Interstate agreement -- Escape of prisoner while in temporary custody.

Escape or attempt to escape from custody, whether within or without this state, while in the temporary custody of an authority of another state acting pursuant to the agreement on detainers shall constitute an offense against this state. Such escape or attempt to escape shall constitute an offense to the same extent and degree as an escape from the institution in which the prisoner was confined immediately prior to having been released to temporary custody, and shall be punishable in the same manner as an escape or attempt to escape from said institution.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

